Louisiana, session 2026, HB559.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:996.42(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§996.42. Judicial expense fund for Fourth Judicial District
A. In addition to all other fees or costs now or hereafter provided by law,
each clerk of court in the Fourth Judicial District shall collect from every person
filing any type of civil suit or proceeding, and who is not otherwise exempted by law
from the payment of court costs, a sum to be determined by the judges of said
district, sitting en banc, which sum shall not exceed fifteen thirty-five dollars,
subject, however, to the provisions of Louisiana Code of Civil Procedure, Article
5181, et seq. In all criminal cases over which the Fourth Judicial District Court has
jurisdiction, there shall be taxed as costs against every defendant who is convicted
after trial, or after he pleads guilty, or who forfeits his bond, a sum likewise
determined, but which shall not exceed fifteen thirty-five dollars, which shall be in
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 559 ENROLLED
addition to all other fines, costs, or forfeitures lawfully imposed, and which shall be
transmitted to the said clerk for further disposition in accordance herewith.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.